Nevada, session 83, AB506.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 228.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.630 1. The Registry Account is hereby created in the
State General Fund for the use of the Attorney General.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. All money collected by the Attorney General pursuant to
NRS 228.580 must be deposited in the State General Fund for credit
to the Registry Account. The interest and income earned on the
money in the Registry Account, after deducting any applicable
charges, must be credited to the Registry Account.
3. Expenditures from the Registry Account must be made only
to administer and enforce the provisions of NRS 228.500 to
228.640, inclusive.
4. The Attorney General shall administer the Registry Account.
All claims against the Registry Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
5. Any money remaining in the Registry Account at the end of
a fiscal year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the
balance in the Registry Account must be carried forward to the next
fiscal year.
6. [Each year,] Before each legislative session, the Attorney
General shall submit to the Legislature an itemized statement of the
income and expenditures for the Registry Account . [:
(a) To the Legislature, if the Legislature is in session; or
(b) To the Interim Finance Committee, if the Legislature is not
in session.]
Sec. 2. NRS 231.0535 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.0535 1. On or before November 1 of each year, the
Executive Director shall submit a report that includes the
information required by this section to:
(a) The Governor; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to [:
(1) The Interim Finance Committee if the report is received
during an odd-numbered year; or
(2) The] the next regular session of the Legislature . [if the
report is received during an even-numbered year.]
2. The report must include, without limitation:
(a) The amount of all grants, gifts and donations of money to the
Catalyst Account created by NRS 231.1573 which have been
applied for and accepted from public and private sources;
(b) The amount of all grants and loans of money from the
Catalyst Account which have been approved by the Executive
Director or the Board pursuant to NRS 231.1577;
(c) The amount of all transferable tax credits which have been
approved by the Executive Director or the Board pursuant to
NRS 231.1555;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(d) The number of businesses which have been created or
expanded in this State, or which have located to this State, because
of grants and loans of money from the Catalyst Account approved
pursuant to NRS 231.1577 or transferable tax credits approved
pursuant to NRS 231.1555; and
(e) The number of jobs which have been created or saved
because of grants and loans of money from the Catalyst Account
approved pursuant to NRS 231.1577 or transferable tax credits
approved pursuant to NRS 231.1555.
Sec. 3. NRS 209.461 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.461 1. The Director shall:
(a) To the greatest extent possible, approximate the normal
conditions of training and employment in the community.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, to the extent
practicable, require each offender, except those whose behavior is
found by the Director to preclude participation, to spend 40 hours
each week in vocational training or employment, unless excused for
a medical reason or to attend educational classes in accordance with
NRS 209.396. The Director shall require as a condition of
employment that an offender sign an authorization for the
deductions from his or her wages made pursuant to NRS 209.463.
Authorization to make the deductions pursuant to NRS 209.463 is
implied from the employment of an offender and a signed
authorization from the offender is not required for the Director to
make the deductions pursuant to NRS 209.463.
(c) Use the earnings from services and manufacturing conducted
by the institutions and the money paid by private employers who
employ the offenders to offset the costs of operating the prison
system and to provide wages for the offenders being trained or
employed.
(d) Provide equipment, space and management for services and
manufacturing by offenders.
(e) Employ craftsmen and other personnel to supervise and
instruct offenders.
(f) Contract with governmental agencies and private employers
for the employment of offenders, including their employment on
public works projects under contracts with the State and with local
governments.
(g) Contract for the use of offenders’ services and for the sale of
goods manufactured by offenders.
(h) On or before January 1, 2014, and every 5 years thereafter,
submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Judiciary. The report must include, without limitation, an analysis of
existing contracts with private employers for the employment of
offenders and the potential impact of those contracts on private
industry in this State.
[(i) Submit a report to each meeting of the Interim Finance
Committee identifying any accounts receivable related to a program
for the employment of offenders.]
2. Every program for the employment of offenders established
by the Director must:
(a) Employ the maximum number of offenders possible;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 209.192, provide for
the use of money produced by the program to reduce the cost of
maintaining the offenders in the institutions;
(c) Have an insignificant effect on the number of jobs available
to the residents of this State; and
(d) Provide occupational training for offenders.
3. An offender may not engage in vocational training,
employment or a business that requires or permits the offender to:
(a) Telemarket or conduct opinion polls by telephone; or
(b) Acquire, review, use or have control over or access to
personal information concerning any person who is not incarcerated.
4. Each fiscal year, the cumulative profits and losses, if any, of
the programs for the employment of offenders established by the
Director must result in a profit for the Department. The following
must not be included in determining whether there is a profit for the
Department:
(a) Fees credited to the Fund for Prison Industries pursuant to
NRS 482.268, any revenue collected by the Department for the
leasing of space, facilities or equipment within the institutions or
facilities of the Department, and any interest or income earned on
the money in the Fund for Prison Industries.
(b) The selling expenses of the Central Administrative Office of
the programs for the employment of offenders. As used in this
paragraph, “selling expenses” means delivery expenses, salaries of
sales personnel and related payroll taxes and costs, the costs of
advertising and the costs of display models.
(c) The general and administrative expenses of the Central
Administrative Office of the programs for the employment of
offenders. As used in this paragraph, “general and administrative
expenses” means the salary of the Deputy Director of Industrial
Programs and the salaries of any other personnel of the Central
Administrative Office and related payroll taxes and costs, the costs
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
of telephone usage, and the costs of office supplies used and postage
used.
5. If any state-sponsored program incurs a net loss for 2
consecutive fiscal years, the Director shall appear before the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary to explain the reasons
for the net loss and provide a plan for the generation of a profit in
the next fiscal year. If the program does not generate a profit in the
third fiscal year, the Director shall take appropriate steps to resolve
the issue.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the Director
may, with the approval of the Board:
(a) Lease spaces and facilities within any institution of the
Department to private employers to be used for the vocational
training and employment of offenders.
(b) Grant to reliable offenders the privilege of leaving
institutions or facilities of the Department at certain times for the
purpose of vocational training or employment.
7. Before entering into any contract with a private employer for
the employment of offenders pursuant to subsection 1, the Director
shall obtain from the private employer:
(a) A personal guarantee to secure an amount fixed by the
Director of:
(1) For a contract that does not relate to construction, not less
than 25 percent of the prorated annual amount of the contract but
not more than 100 percent of the prorated annual amount of the
contract, a surety bond made payable to the State of Nevada in an
amount fixed by the Director of not less than 25 percent of the
prorated annual amount of the contract but not more than 100
percent of the prorated annual amount of the contract and
conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract in
accordance with the terms and conditions of the contract; or
(2) For a contract that relates to construction, not less than
100 percent of the prorated annual amount of the contract, a surety
bond made payable to the State of Nevada in an amount fixed by the
Director of not less than 100 percent of the prorated annual amount
of the contract and conditioned upon the faithful performance of the
contract in accordance with the terms and conditions of the contract,
 or a security agreement to secure any debt, obligation or other
liability of the private employer under the contract, including,
without limitation, lease payments, wages earned by offenders and
compensation earned by personnel of the Department. The Director
shall appear before the Joint Interim Standing Committee on the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Judiciary to explain the reasons for the amount fixed by the Director
for any personal guarantee or surety bond.
(b) A detailed written analysis on the estimated impact of the
contract on private industry in this State. The written analysis must
include, without limitation:
(1) The number of private companies in this State currently
providing the types of products and services offered in the proposed
contract.
(2) The number of residents of this State currently employed
by such private companies.
(3) The number of offenders that would be employed under
the contract.
(4) The skills that the offenders would acquire under the
contract.
8. The provisions of this chapter do not create a right on behalf
of the offender to employment or to receive the federal or state
minimum wage for any employment and do not establish a basis for
any cause of action against the State or its officers or employees for
employment of an offender or for payment of the federal or state
minimum wage to an offender.
9. As used in this section, “state-sponsored program” means a
program for the vocational training or employment of offenders
which does not include a contract of employment with a private
employer.
Sec. 4. NRS 218E.625 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.625 1. The Legislative Bureau of Educational
Accountability and Program Evaluation is hereby created within the
Fiscal Analysis Division. The Fiscal Analysts shall appoint to the
Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability and Program
Evaluation a Chief and such other personnel as the Fiscal Analysts
determine are necessary for the Bureau to carry out its duties
pursuant to this section.
2. The Bureau shall, as the Fiscal Analysts determine is
necessary or at the request of the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Education:
(a) Collect and analyze data and issue written reports
concerning:
(1) The effectiveness of the provisions of chapter 385A of
NRS in improving the accountability of the schools of this State;
(2) The statewide program to reduce the ratio of pupils per
class per licensed teacher prescribed in NRS 388.700, 388.710 and
388.720;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(3) The statewide program to educate persons with
disabilities that is set forth in NRS 388.5223 to 388.5243, inclusive;
(4) The results of the examinations of the National
Assessment of Educational Progress that are administered pursuant
to NRS 390.830; and
(5) Any program or legislative measure, the purpose of
which is to reform the system of education within this State.
(b) Conduct studies and analyses to evaluate the performance
and progress of the system of public education within this State.
Such studies and analyses may be conducted:
(1) As the Fiscal Analysts determine are necessary; or
(2) At the request of the Legislature.
 This paragraph does not prohibit the Bureau from contracting
with a person or entity to conduct studies and analyses on behalf of
the Bureau.
(c) On or before October 1 of each even-numbered year, submit
a written report of its findings pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) to
the Director for transmission to the next regular session. [The
Bureau shall, on or before October 1 of each odd-numbered year,
submit a written report of its findings pursuant to paragraphs (a) and
(b) to the Director for transmission to the Legislative Commission
and to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education.]
3. The Bureau may, pursuant to NRS 218F.620, require a
school, a school district, the Nevada System of Higher Education or
the Department of Education to submit to the Bureau books, papers,
records and other information that the Chief of the Bureau
determines are necessary to carry out the duties of the Bureau
pursuant to this section. An entity whom the Bureau requests to
produce records or other information shall provide the records or
other information in any readily available format specified by the
Bureau.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
239.0115, any information obtained by the Bureau pursuant to this
section shall be deemed a work product that is confidential pursuant
to NRS 218F.150. The Bureau may, at the discretion of the Chief
and after submission to the Legislature , [or Legislative
Commission, as appropriate,] publish reports of its findings pursuant
to paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 2.
5. This section does not prohibit the Department of Education
or the State Board of Education from conducting analyses,
submitting reports or otherwise reviewing educational programs in
this State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
Sec. 5. NRS 285.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
285.060 1. Upon receiving an employee suggestion pursuant
to NRS 285.050, the Secretary of the Board shall:
(a) Record and acknowledge receipt of the employee suggestion;
(b) Notify the state employee or each state employee of a group
of state employees who submitted the employee suggestion of any
undue delays in the consideration of the employee suggestion; and
(c) Refer the employee suggestion at once to the head of the
state agency or agencies affected, or his or her designee, for
consideration.
2. Within 30 days after receiving an employee suggestion that
is referred pursuant to subsection 1, the head of the state agency, or
his or her designee, shall report his or her findings and, if applicable,
recommendations to the Board unless the Board has, for good cause,
extended the period. The report must indicate:
(a) Whether the employee suggestion has been adopted.
(b) If adopted:
(1) The day on which the employee suggestion was put into
practice.
(2) The actual or estimated reduction, elimination or
avoidance of state expenditures or any improvement in the operation
of the State Government made possible by the employee suggestion.
(3) If the employee suggestion was submitted by a group of
state employees, a recommendation of the distribution of any
potential award made pursuant to NRS 285.070 to each state
employee in the group. Such a distribution must be made in equal
proportion to each state employee in the group.
(c) If rejected, the reasons for rejection.
(d) If applicable, whether legislation will be required before the
employee suggestion may be adopted.
3. The Board shall:
(a) Review the findings and, if applicable, recommendations of
the state agency and may obtain additional information or take such
other action as is necessary for prompt, thorough and impartial
consideration of each employee suggestion.
(b) Evaluate each employee suggestion, taking into
consideration any action by the state agency, staff recommendations
and the objectives of the Merit Award Program.
(c) Monitor the efficacy and progress of employee suggestions
that have been adopted and put into practice.
(d) Provide a report to the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance [and the Interim Finance Committee] not later than 90 days
after the end of each fiscal year ending on June 30 of an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
even-numbered year summarizing, for that fiscal year and the
previous fiscal year:
(1) The employee suggestions that were rejected by state
agencies.
(2) The employee suggestions that were adopted by state
agencies and detailing any actual reduction, elimination or
avoidance of state expenditures or any improvement in the operation
of the State Government made possible by the employee suggestion.
(3) Any legislation required to be enacted before an
employee suggestion may be adopted.
Sec. 6. NRS 332.431 is hereby amended to read as follows:
332.431 1. Each local government that enters into a
performance contract pursuant to NRS 332.300 to 332.440,
inclusive, shall, on or before February 1 of each year, prepare and
submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature . [if the Legislature is in session, or to
the Interim Finance Committee if the Legislature is not in session.]
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) The status of the construction and financing of the operating
cost-savings measures described in the performance contract.
(b) The cumulative amount of operating cost-savings that have
resulted from the operating cost-savings measures.
(c) The amount of operating cost-savings that are projected for
the future.
(d) Any other information required by the Legislature . [or
Interim Finance Committee.]
Sec. 7. NRS 333.3368 is hereby amended to read as follows:
333.3368 The Purchasing Division shall, every 6 months,
submit to the Legislature, if it is in session, or to [the Interim
Finance Committee and] the Legislative Committee on Senior
Citizens, Veterans and Adults with Special Needs created by NRS
218E.750, if the Legislature is not in session, a report which must
contain, for the period since the submission of the last report:
1. The number of state purchasing contracts that were subject
to the provisions of NRS 333.3361 to 333.3369, inclusive.
2. The total dollar amount of state purchasing contracts that
were subject to the provisions of NRS 333.3361 to 333.3369,
inclusive.
3. The number of local businesses owned and operated by
veterans with service-connected disabilities that submitted a bid or
proposal on a state purchasing contract.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
4. The number of state purchasing contracts that were awarded
to local businesses owned and operated by veterans with service-
connected disabilities.
5. The total number of dollars’ worth of state purchasing
contracts that were awarded to local businesses owned and operated
by veterans with service-connected disabilities.
6. Any other information deemed relevant by the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau.
Sec. 8. NRS 333.705 is hereby amended to read as follows:
333.705 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
using agency shall not enter into a contract with a person to provide
services for the using agency if:
(a) The person is a current employee of an agency of this State;
(b) The person is a former employee of an agency of this State
and less than 2 years have expired since the termination of the
person’s employment with the State; or
(c) The person is employed by the Department of Transportation
for a transportation project that is entirely funded by federal money
and the term of the contract is for more than 4 years,
 unless the using agency submits a written disclosure to the State
Board of Examiners indicating the services to be provided pursuant
to the contract and the person who will be providing those services
and, after reviewing the disclosure, the State Board of Examiners
approves entering into a contract with the person. The requirements
of this subsection apply to any person employed by a business or
other entity that enters into a contract to provide services for a using
agency if the person will be performing or producing the services
for which the business or entity is employed.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 apply to
employment through a temporary employment service. A temporary
employment service providing employees for a using agency shall
provide the using agency with the names of the employees to be
provided to the agency. The State Board of Examiners shall not
approve a contract pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 unless
the Board determines that one or more of the following
circumstances exist:
(a) The person provides services that are not provided by any
other employee of the using agency or for which a critical labor
shortage exists; or
(b) A short-term need or unusual economic circumstance exists
for the using agency to contract with the person.
3. The approval by the State Board of Examiners to contract
with a person pursuant to subsection 1:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(a) May occur at the same time and in the same manner as the
approval by the State Board of Examiners of a proposed contract
pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 333.700; and
(b) Must occur before the date on which the contract becomes
binding on the using agency.
4. A using agency may contract with a person pursuant to
paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 1 without obtaining the approval
of the State Board of Examiners if the term of the contract is for less
than 4 months and the head of the using agency determines that an
emergency exists which necessitates the contract. If a using agency
contracts with a person pursuant to this subsection, the using agency
shall submit a copy of the contract and a description of the
emergency to the State Board of Examiners, which shall review the
contract and the description of the emergency and notify the using
agency whether the State Board of Examiners would have approved
the contract if it had not been entered into pursuant to this
subsection.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [9,] 8, a using
agency shall, not later than 10 days after the end of each fiscal
quarter, report to the Interim Finance Committee concerning all
contracts to provide services for the using agency that were entered
into by the using agency during the fiscal quarter with a person who
is a current or former employee of a department, division or other
agency of this State.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [9,] 8, a using
agency shall not contract with a temporary employment service
unless the contracting process is controlled by rules of open
competitive bidding.
7. [Each board or commission of this State and each institution
of the Nevada System of Higher Education that employs a
consultant shall, at least once every 6 months, submit to the Interim
Finance Committee a report setting forth:
(a) The number of consultants employed by the board,
commission or institution;
(b) The purpose for which the board, commission or institution
employs each consultant;
(c) The amount of money or other remuneration received by
each consultant from the board, commission or institution; and
(d) The length of time each consultant has been employed by the
board, commission or institution.
8.] A using agency, board or commission of this State and each
institution of the Nevada System of Higher Education:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(a) Shall make every effort to limit the number of contracts it
enters into with persons to provide services which have a term of
more than 2 years and which are in the amount of less than
$1,000,000; and
(b) Shall not enter into a contract with a person to provide
services without ensuring that the person is in active and good
standing with the Secretary of State.
[9.] 8. The provisions of subsections 1 to 6, inclusive, do not
apply to:
(a) The Nevada System of Higher Education or a board or
commission of this State.
(b) The employment of professional engineers by the
Department of Transportation if those engineers are employed for a
transportation project that is entirely funded by federal money.
(c) Contracts in the amount of $1,000,000 or more entered into:
(1) Pursuant to the State Plan for Medicaid established
pursuant to NRS 422.063.
(2) For financial services.
(3) Pursuant to the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
(d) The employment of a person by a business or entity which is
a provider of services under the State Plan for Medicaid and which
provides such services on a fee-for-service basis or through
managed care.
(e) The employment of a former employee of an agency of this
State who is not receiving retirement benefits under the Public
Employees’ Retirement System during the duration of the contract.
Sec. 9. NRS 353B.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353B.170 The Board shall:
1. Prepare an annual report setting forth in appropriate detail an
accounting of the Trust Fund and a description of the financial
condition of the Trust Fund at the close of each fiscal year,
including, without limitation, a statement of projected receipts,
disbursements and operating costs of the Trust Fund.
2. Submit the report prepared pursuant to subsection 1 on or
before March 31 of each year:
(a) In odd-numbered years, to the Governor, the Senate Standing
Committee on Finance and the Assembly Standing Committee on
Ways and Means.
(b) In even-numbered years, to the Governor . [and the Interim
Finance Committee.]
Sec. 10. NRS 388.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.700 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, for
each school quarter of a school year, the ratio in each school district
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
of pupils per licensed teacher designated to teach, on a full-time
basis, in classes where core curriculum is taught:
(a) In kindergarten and grades 1 and 2, must not exceed 16 to 1,
and in grade 3, must not exceed 18 to 1; or
(b) If a plan is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, must not exceed the ratio set forth in that plan for the grade
levels specified in the plan.
 In determining this ratio, all licensed educational personnel who
teach a grade level specified in paragraph (a) or a grade level
specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, as applicable for the school district, must be counted
except teachers of art, music, physical education or special
education, teachers who teach one or two specific subject areas to
more than one classroom of pupils, counselors, librarians,
administrators, deans, specialists, any administrators or other
licensed educational personnel, including, without limitation,
counselors, coaches and special education teachers, who may be
present in a classroom but do not teach every pupil in the classroom
and teachers who are not actively teaching pupils during a class
period or who do not teach a subject area for which the ratio of
pupils per licensed teacher is being determined.
2. A school district may, within the limits of any plan adopted
pursuant to NRS 388.720, assign a pupil whose enrollment in a
grade occurs after the end of a quarter during the school year to any
existing class regardless of the number of pupils in the class if the
school district requests and is approved for a variance from the State
Board pursuant to subsection 4.
3. Each school district that includes one or more elementary
schools which exceed the ratio of pupils per class during any quarter
of a school year, as reported to the Department pursuant to
NRS 388.725:
(a) Set forth in subsection 1;
(b) Prescribed in conjunction with a legislative appropriation for
the support of the class-size reduction program; or
(c) Defined by a legislatively approved alternative class-size
reduction plan, if applicable to that school district,
 must request a variance for each such school for the next quarter
of the current school year if a quarter remains in that school year or
for the next quarter of the succeeding school year, as applicable,
from the State Board by providing a written statement that includes
the reasons for the request, the justification for exceeding the
applicable prescribed ratio of pupils per class and a plan of actions
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
that the school district will take to reduce the ratio of pupils per
class.
4. The State Board may grant to a school district a variance
from the limitation on the number of pupils per class set forth in
paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of subsection 3 for good cause, including
the lack of available financial support specifically set aside for the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios.
5. [The State Board shall, on a quarterly basis, submit a report
to the Interim Finance Committee on each variance requested by a
school district pursuant to subsection 4 during the preceding quarter
and, if a variance was granted, an identification of each elementary
school for which a variance was granted and the specific
justification for the variance.
6.] The State Board shall, on or before February 1 of each odd-
numbered year, submit a report to the Legislature on:
(a) Each variance requested by a school district pursuant to
subsection 4 during the preceding biennium and, if a variance was
granted, an identification of each elementary school for which
variance was granted and the specific justification for the variance.
(b) The data reported to it by the various school districts
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 388.710, including an explanation
of that data, and the current pupil-teacher ratios per class in the
grade levels specified in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade
levels specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 388.720, as applicable for the school district.
[7.] 6. The Department shall, on or before November 15 of
each year, report to the Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau:
(a) The number of teachers employed full-time;
(b) The number of teachers employed in order to attain the ratio
required by subsection 1;
(c) The number of substitute teachers filling vacancies or long-
term positions;
(d) The number of pupils enrolled; and
(e) The number of teachers assigned to teach in the same
classroom with another teacher or in any other arrangement other
than one teacher assigned to one classroom of pupils,
 during the current school year in the grade levels specified in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade levels specified in a plan
that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 388.720, as
applicable, for each school district.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
[8.] 7. The provisions of this section do not apply to a charter
school or to a program of distance education provided pursuant to
NRS 388.820 to 388.874, inclusive.
Sec. 11. NRS 432A.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432A.055 [1.] Subject to the provisions of chapter 353 of
NRS, the Department may accept gifts and grants of money,
property and services for the establishment of a program for child
care.
[2. The Department shall report to the Interim Finance
Committee any applications for, and the receipt of, any gifts or
grants pursuant to subsection 1.]
Sec. 12. NRS 445B.830 is hereby amended to read as follows:
445B.830 1. In areas of the State where and when a program
is commenced pursuant to NRS 445B.770 to 445B.815, inclusive,
the following fees must be paid to the Department of Motor
Vehicles and accounted for in the Pollution Control Account, which
is hereby created in the State General Fund:
(a) For the issuance and annual renewal of a license for an
authorized inspection station, authorized station or fleet
station ............................................................................................ $25
(b) For each set of 25 forms certifying emission control
compliance .................................................................................... 150
(c) For each form issued to a fleet station ................................... 6
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, and after
deduction of the amounts distributed pursuant to subsections 4 and
[7,] 6, money in the Pollution Control Account may, pursuant to
legislative appropriation or with the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee, be expended by the following agencies in the following
order of priority:
(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles to carry out the
provisions of NRS 445B.770 to 445B.845, inclusive.
(b) The State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The State Department of Agriculture to carry out the
provisions of NRS 590.010 to 590.150, inclusive.
(d) Local air pollution control agencies in nonattainment or
maintenance areas for an air pollutant for which air quality criteria
have been issued pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7408, for programs related
to the improvement of the quality of the air.
(e) The Tahoe Regional Planning Agency to carry out the
provisions of NRS 277.200 with respect to the preservation and
improvement of air quality in the Lake Tahoe Basin.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
3. The Department of Motor Vehicles may prescribe by
regulation routine fees for inspection at the prevailing shop labor
rate, including, without limitation, maximum charges for those fees,
and for the posting of those fees in a conspicuous place at an
authorized inspection station or authorized station.
4. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall make quarterly
distributions of money in the Pollution Control Account to local air
pollution control agencies in nonattainment or maintenance areas for
an air pollutant for which air quality criteria have been issued
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7408. The distributions of money made to
agencies in a county pursuant to this subsection must be made from
an amount of money in the Pollution Control Account that is equal
to one-sixth of the amount received for each form issued in the
county pursuant to subsection 1.
5. [Each local air pollution control agency that receives money
pursuant to subsections 4, 6 and 7 shall, not later than 45 days after
the end of the fiscal year in which the money is received, submit to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Interim Finance Committee a report on the use of the money
received.
6.] The Department of Motor Vehicles shall make annual
distributions of excess money in the Pollution Control Account to
local air pollution control agencies in nonattainment or maintenance
areas for an air pollutant for which air quality criteria have been
issued pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7408, for programs related to the
improvement of the quality of the air. The distributions of excess
money made to local air pollution control agencies in a county
pursuant to this subsection must be made in an amount
proportionate to the number of forms issued in the county pursuant
to subsection 1. As used in this subsection, “excess money” means
the money in excess of $1,000,000 remaining in the Pollution
Control Account at the end of the fiscal year, after deduction of the
amounts distributed pursuant to subsections 4 and [7] 6 and any
disbursements made from the Account pursuant to subsection 2.
[7.] 6. If a board of county commissioners imposes an
additional fee pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 445B.834, the
Department of Motor Vehicles shall:
(a) Upon receiving the notification pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 445B.834, collect the additional fee on behalf of the county
and account separately for money from the additional fee in the
Pollution Control Account; and
(b) Make quarterly distributions of the money in the Pollution
Control Account attributable to each county whose board of county
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
commissioners imposed the additional fee. The distributions made
pursuant to this paragraph must be equal to the amount of money
collected on behalf of the county pursuant to the additional fee
imposed by the board of county commissioners of the county.
[8.] 7. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide for the
creation of an advisory committee consisting of representatives of
state and local agencies involved in the control of emissions from
motor vehicles. The committee shall:
(a) Establish goals and objectives for the program for control of
emissions from motor vehicles;
(b) Identify areas where funding should be made available; and
(c) Review and make recommendations concerning regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 445B.770.
Sec. 13. NRS 445B.834 is hereby amended to read as follows:
445B.834 1. The board of county commissioners of a county
whose population is 100,000 or more may by ordinance impose an
additional fee for each form certifying emission control compliance.
2. If a board of county commissioners imposes an additional
fee pursuant to subsection 1, the board of county commissioners
shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles for the purposes of
collecting and distributing the additional fee pursuant to subsection
[7] 6 of NRS 445B.830.
3. If a board of county commissioners imposes an additional
fee pursuant to subsection 1, the board shall:
(a) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (b), use any money
received from the additional fee to support the programs of local air
pollution control agencies to reduce emissions from a motor vehicle;
and
(b) Allocate at least 50 percent of any money received from the
additional fee to support the programs of local air pollution control
agencies to reduce emissions from a motor vehicle for the benefit of
historically underserved communities.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Additional fee” does not include any fee that is imposed
pursuant to paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 445B.830.
(b) “Block” means the smallest geographical unit whose
boundaries were designated by the Bureau of the Census of the
United States Department of Commerce in its topographically
integrated geographic encoding and referencing system.
(c) “Block group” means a combination of blocks whose
numbers begin with the same digit.
(d) “Census tract” means a combination of block groups.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(e) “Historically underserved community” means:
(1) A census tract:
(I) Designated as a qualified census tract by the United
States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to 26
U.S.C. § 42(d)(5)(B)(ii); or
(II) In which, in the immediately preceding census, at
least 20 percent of households were not proficient in the English
language;
(2) A community in this State with at least one public school:
(I) In which 75 percent or more of the enrolled pupils in
the school are eligible for free or reduced-price lunches pursuant to
42 U.S.C. §§ 1751 et seq.; or
(II) That participates in universal meal service in high
poverty areas pursuant to Section 104 of the Healthy, Hunger-Free
Kids Act of 2010, Public Law 111-296; or
(3) A community in this State located on qualified tribal
land, as defined in NRS 370.0325.
Sec. 14. NRS 538.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
538.650 1. If a judicial or administrative proceeding has been
initiated, by or on behalf of a person or other entity from outside of
this state, that could adversely affect or place in jeopardy a water
right or supply of water within this state, a local government may
submit a request to the Director of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources for a special distribution by the
Interim Finance Committee from the Contingency Account.
2. The Director of the State Department of Conservation and
Natural Resources shall consider the request, may require from the
requester such additional information as it deems appropriate, and
shall, if the Director finds that a special distribution should be made,
request approval from the State Board of Examiners and amount of
the distribution to the Interim Finance Committee for its
independent evaluation and action. The Interim Finance Committee
is not bound to follow the recommendation of the State Board of
Examiners or the Director of the State Department of Conservation
and Natural Resources.
3. The State Board of Examiners and the Director of the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall transmit
its recommendation to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau, who shall notify the Chair of the Interim Finance
Committee. The Chair shall call a meeting of the Committee to
consider the recommendation.
4. The Interim Finance Committee may make a special
distribution from the Contingency Account if it finds that:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
(a) The grant will be expended to assist local governments in the
defense and protection of water rights and supplies of water, on
behalf of the people of this state, from any challenge or
encroachment originating outside of this state; and
(b) The requester will provide an amount of money, at least
equal to the grant, for the same purpose.
5. The recipient of a special distribution made pursuant to this
section:
(a) Shall provide an amount of money at least equal to the
allocation which must be used for the same purpose.
(b) May, in accomplishing the public purpose set forth in
paragraph (a) of subsection 4, use the money to employ legal
counsel and other consultants necessary to participate in or negotiate
the settlement of judicial or administrative proceedings concerning
water rights or supplies of water.
[(c) Shall report to the Interim Finance Committee upon the
expenditure of the money at such times and in such detail as is
required by the Interim Finance Committee.]
6. The total of the special distributions made by the Interim
Finance Committee pursuant to this section must not exceed
$250,000 during each biennium. Any money distributed pursuant to
this section that is not expended for the purpose for which it was
distributed reverts to the Contingency Account at such time as is
specified by the Interim Finance Committee.
7. As used in this section, “local government” means a political
subdivision of this state, including, without limitation, a city,
county, irrigation district, water district or water conservancy
district.
Sec. 15. NRS 624.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.540 1. The Board shall:
(a) On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, prepare
and submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the appropriate legislative committee [if the
Legislature is in session, or to the Interim Finance Committee if the
Legislature is not in session,] a statement of the condition of the
account that is prepared in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(b) Employ accountants as necessary for the performance of the
duties set forth in this section and pay any related expenses from the
money in the account. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the expenditures made by the Board pursuant to this paragraph must
not exceed $10,000 in any fiscal year.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
(c) Employ or contract with persons and procure necessary
equipment, supplies and services to be paid from or purchased with
the money in the account as may be necessary to monitor or process
claims filed by injured persons that may result in a recovery from
the account.
2. Any interest earned on the money in the account must be
credited to the account. The Board may expend the interest earned
on the money in the account to increase public awareness of the
account. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
expenditures made by the Board for this purpose must not exceed
$50,000 in any fiscal year.
3. The total expenditures made by the Board pursuant to this
section must not exceed 10 percent of the account in any fiscal year.
Sec. 16. NRS 678C.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.700 1. The University of Nevada, Reno, School of
Medicine shall establish a program for the evaluation and research
of the medical use of cannabis in the care and treatment of persons
who have been diagnosed with a chronic or debilitating medical
condition.
2. Before the School of Medicine establishes a program
pursuant to subsection 1, the School of Medicine shall aggressively
seek and must receive approval of the program by the Federal
Government pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 823 or other applicable
provisions of federal law, to allow the creation of a federally
approved research program for the use and distribution of cannabis
for medical purposes.
3. A research program established pursuant to this section must
include residents of this State who volunteer to act as participants
and subjects, as determined by the School of Medicine.
4. A resident of this State who wishes to serve as a participant
and subject in a research program established pursuant to this
section may notify the School of Medicine and may apply to
participate by submitting an application on a form prescribed by the
Department of Administration of the School of Medicine.
[5. The School of Medicine shall, on a quarterly basis, report to
the Interim Finance Committee with respect to:
(a) The progress made by the School of Medicine in obtaining
federal approval for the research program; and
(b) If the research program receives federal approval, the status
of, activities of and information received from the research
program.]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
Sec. 17. NRS 701B.921 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701B.921 1. The Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation and the Housing Division of the Department of
Business and Industry shall establish contractual relationships with
one or more nonprofit collaboratives to carry out the State’s mission
of creating new jobs in the fields of energy efficiency and renewable
energy by combining job training with weatherization, energy
retrofit applications or the development of renewable energy plants.
2. To qualify as a nonprofit collaborative for the purposes of
this section, a nonprofit entity:
(a) Must enter into a written agreement relating to job training
and career development activities with:
(1) A labor management agency or other affiliated agency
which has established an apprenticeship program that is registered
and approved by the State Apprenticeship Council pursuant to
chapter 610 of NRS; and
(2) A community college or another institution of higher
education; and
(b) Must conduct or have the ability to conduct training
programs in at least one of the three geographic regions of this State,
including southern Nevada, northern Nevada and rural Nevada.
 Such a nonprofit entity may also enter into a written agreement
relating to job training and career development activities with a
trade association which has an accredited job skills training
program.
3. Within the limits of money available to the Department for
this purpose, the Department shall contract with one or more
qualified nonprofit collaboratives to:
(a) Carry out programs for job training in fields relating to
energy efficiency and the use of renewable energy.
(b) In concert with a labor management agency or other
affiliated agency which has established an apprenticeship program
that is registered and approved by the State Apprenticeship Council
pursuant to chapter 610 of NRS, develop apprenticeship programs to
train laborers in skills related to:
(1) The implementation of energy efficiency measures.
(2) The use of renewable energy.
(3) Performing audits of the energy efficiency of buildings,
facilities, residences and structures.
(4) The weatherization of buildings, facilities, residences and
structures.
(5) The retrofitting of buildings, facilities, residences and
structures.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(6) The construction and operation of centralized renewable
energy plants.
(7) The manufacturing of components relating to work
performed pursuant to subparagraphs (1) to (6), inclusive.
4. The job training described in subsection 3 must be
sufficiently detailed to allow workers, as applicable, to perform:
(a) The services set forth in NRS 702.270.
(b) The services set forth in NRS 618.910 to 618.936, inclusive.
(c) Such other vocational or professional services, or both, as the
Department deems appropriate.
5. Funding provided for the job training described in
subsection 3:
(a) Must, to the extent money is available for the purpose,
include the cost of tuition and supplies.
(b) May include a cost-of-living stipend which may or may not
be in addition to any available unemployment compensation.
6. Within the limits of money available to the Division for the
purpose, the Division shall contract with one or more governmental
entities, community action agencies or nonprofit organizations,
including, without limitation, qualified nonprofit collaboratives, to:
(a) Identify, in different regions of the State, neighborhoods that
will qualify for funding for residential weatherization projects
pursuant to federal programs focusing on residential weatherization;
and
(b) Issue requests for proposals for contractors and award
contracts for projects to promote energy efficiency through
weatherization. Any such requests for proposals and contracts must
include, without limitation:
(1) Provisions stipulating that all employees of the outside
contractors who work on the project must be paid prevailing wages;
(2) Provisions requiring that each outside contractor:
(I) Employ on each such project a number of persons
trained as described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3 that is equal to
or greater than 50 percent of the total workforce the contractor
employs on the project; or
(II) If the Director of the Department determines in
writing, pursuant to a request submitted by the contractor, that the
contractor cannot reasonably comply with the provisions of sub-
subparagraph (I) because there are not available a sufficient number
of such trained persons, employ a number of persons trained as
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3 or trained through any
apprenticeship program that is registered and approved by the State
Apprenticeship Council pursuant to chapter 610 of NRS that is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
equal to or greater than 50 percent of the total workforce the
contractor employs on the project;
(3) A component pursuant to which persons trained as
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3 must be classified and
paid prevailing wages depending upon the classification of the skill
in which they are trained; and
(4) A component that requires each contractor to offer to
employees working on the project, and to their dependents, health
care in the same manner as a policy of insurance pursuant to
chapters 689A and 689B of NRS or the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act of 1974.
7. The Department and the Division:
(a) Shall apply for and accept any grant, appropriation,
allocation or other money available pursuant to:
(1) The Green Jobs Act of 2007, 29 U.S.C. § 2916(e); and
(2) The American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009,
Public Law 111-5; and
(b) May apply for and accept any other available gift, grant,
appropriation or donation from any public or private source,
 to assist the Department and the Division in carrying out the
provisions of this section.
8. [The Department and the Division shall each report to the
Interim Finance Committee at each meeting held by the Interim
Finance Committee with respect to the activities in which they have
engaged pursuant to this section.
9.] As used in this section, “community action agencies”
means private corporations or public agencies established pursuant
to the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964, Public Law 88-452,
which are authorized to administer money received from federal,
state, local or private funding entities to assess, design, operate,
finance and oversee antipoverty programs.
Sec. 18. NRS 701B.924 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701B.924 1. The State Public Works Board shall, within 90
days after June 9, 2009, determine the specific projects to
weatherize and retrofit public buildings, facilities and structures,
including, without limitation, traffic-control systems, and to
otherwise use sources of renewable energy to serve those buildings,
facilities and structures pursuant to the provisions of this section and
NRS 701B.921. The projects must be prioritized and selected on the
basis of the following criteria:
(a) The length of time necessary to commence the project.
(b) The number of workers estimated to be employed on the
project.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
(c) The effectiveness of the project in reducing energy
consumption.
(d) The estimated cost of the project.
(e) Whether the project is able to be powered by or to otherwise
use sources of renewable energy.
(f) Whether the project has qualified for participation in one or
more of the following programs:
(1) The Solar Energy Systems Incentive Program created by
NRS 701B.240;
(2) The Renewable Energy School Pilot Program created by
NRS 701B.350;
(3) The Wind Energy Systems Demonstration Program
created by NRS 701B.580;
(4) The Waterpower Energy Systems Demonstration
Program created by NRS 701B.820; or
(5) An energy efficiency or energy conservation program
offered by a public utility, as defined in NRS 704.020, pursuant to a
plan approved by the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada
pursuant to NRS 704.741.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall, within 90
days after June 9, 2009, determine the specific projects to
weatherize and retrofit public buildings, facilities and structures,
including, without limitation, traffic-control systems, and to
otherwise use sources of renewable energy to serve those buildings,
facilities and structures pursuant to the provisions of this section and
NRS 701B.921. The projects must be prioritized and selected on the
basis of the following criteria:
(a) The length of time necessary to commence the project.
(b) The number of workers estimated to be employed on the
project.
(c) The effectiveness of the project in reducing energy
consumption.
(d) The estimated cost of the project.
(e) Whether the project is able to be powered by or to otherwise
use sources of renewable energy.
(f) Whether the project has qualified for participation in one or
more of the following programs:
(1) The Solar Energy Systems Incentive Program created by
NRS 701B.240;
(2) The Renewable Energy School Pilot Program created by
NRS 701B.350;
(3) The Wind Energy Systems Demonstration Program
created by NRS 701B.580;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
(4) The Waterpower Energy Systems Demonstration
Program created by NRS 701B.820; or
(5) An energy efficiency or energy conservation program
offered by a public utility, as defined in NRS 704.020, pursuant to a
plan approved by the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada
pursuant to NRS 704.741.
3. The Board of Regents of the University of Nevada shall,
within 90 days after June 9, 2009, determine the specific projects to
weatherize and retrofit public buildings, facilities and structures,
including, without limitation, traffic-control systems, and to
otherwise use sources of renewable energy to serve those buildings,
facilities and structures pursuant to the provisions of this section and
NRS 701B.921. The projects must be prioritized and selected on the
basis of the following criteria:
(a) The length of time necessary to commence the project.
(b) The number of workers estimated to be employed on the
project.
(c) The effectiveness of the project in reducing energy
consumption.
(d) The estimated cost of the project.
(e) Whether the project is able to be powered by or to otherwise
use sources of renewable energy.
(f) Whether the project has qualified for participation in one or
more of the following programs:
(1) The Solar Energy Systems Incentive Program created by
NRS 701B.240;
(2) The Renewable Energy School Pilot Program created by
NRS 701B.350;
(3) The Wind Energy Systems Demonstration Program
created by NRS 701B.580;
(4) The Waterpower Energy Systems Demonstration
Program created by NRS 701B.820; or
(5) An energy efficiency or energy conservation program
offered by a public utility, as defined in NRS 704.020, pursuant to a
plan approved by the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada
pursuant to NRS 704.741.
4. As soon as practicable after an entity described in
subsections 1, 2 and 3 selects a project, the entity shall proceed to
enter into a contract with one or more contractors to perform the
work on the project. The request for proposals and all contracts for
each project must include, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
(a) Provisions stipulating that all employees of the contractors
and subcontractors who work on the project must be paid prevailing
wages pursuant to the requirements of chapter 338 of NRS;
(b) Provisions requiring that each contractor and subcontractor
employed on each such project:
(1) Employ a number of persons trained as described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 3 of NRS 701B.921 that is equal to or
greater than 50 percent of the total workforce the contractor or
subcontractor employs on the project; or
(2) If the Director of the Department determines in writing,
pursuant to a request submitted by the contractor or subcontractor,
that the contractor or subcontractor cannot reasonably comply with
the provisions of subparagraph (1) because there are not available a
sufficient number of such trained persons, employ a number of
persons trained as described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3 of NRS
701B.921 or trained through any apprenticeship program that is
registered and approved by the State Apprenticeship Council
pursuant to chapter 610 of NRS that is equal to or greater than 50
percent of the total workforce the contractor or subcontractor
employs on the project;
(c) A component pursuant to which persons trained as described
in paragraph (b) of subsection 3 of NRS 701B.921 must be
classified and paid prevailing wages depending upon the
classification of the skill in which they are trained; and
(d) A component that requires each contractor or subcontractor
to offer to employees working on the project, and to their
dependents, health care in the same manner as a policy of insurance
pursuant to chapters 689A and 689B of NRS or the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
[5. The State Public Works Board, each of the school districts
and the Board of Regents of the University of Nevada shall each
provide a report to the Interim Finance Committee which describes
the projects selected pursuant to this section and a report of the dates
on which those projects are scheduled to be completed.]
Sec. 19. NRS 703.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
703.025 1. The Commission, by majority vote, shall organize
the Commission into sections, alter the organization of the
Commission and reassign responsibilities and duties of the sections
of the Commission as the Commission deems necessary to provide:
(a) Advice and guidance to the Commission on economic
policies relating to utilities under the jurisdiction of the
Commission, and the regulation of such utilities;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
(b) Administrative, technical, legal and support services to the
Commission; and
(c) For the regulation of utilities governed by the Commission
and the services offered by such utilities, including, but not limited
to, licensing of such utilities and services and the resolution of
consumer complaints.
2. The Commission shall:
(a) Formulate the policies of the various sections of the
Commission;
(b) Coordinate the activities of the various sections of the
Commission;
(c) If customers are authorized by a specific statute to obtain a
competitive, discretionary or potentially competitive utility service,
take any actions which are consistent with the statute and which are
necessary to encourage and enhance:
(1) A competitive market for the provision of that utility
service to customers in this State; and
(2) The reliability and safety of the provision of that utility
service within that competitive market; and
(d) Adopt such regulations consistent with law as the
Commission deems necessary for the operation of the Commission
and the enforcement of all laws administered by the Commission.
3. Before reorganizing the Commission, the Commission shall
submit the plan for reorganization to:
(a) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the appropriate legislative committee ; [and the
Interim Finance Committee;] and
(b) The Director of the Office of Finance.
Sec. 20. Section 13.3 of the Clark County Sales and Use Tax
Act of 2005, being chapter 249, Statutes of Nevada 2005, as added
by chapter 1, Statutes of Nevada 2013, 27th Special Session, and
amended by chapter 623, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 4192, is
hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 13.3. 1. The provisions of paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 and subsections 3 to 8, inclusive, of section 13
of this act do not apply to any expenditure of proceeds from
any sales and use tax imposed pursuant to this act on or after
July 1, 2013, but before July 1, 2016.
2. In addition to the requirements of section 13.5 of this
act , [:
(a) The] the periodic reports required by that section must
include, with respect to the period covered by the report, a
separate detailed description of the expenditure of any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
proceeds from the sales and use tax imposed pursuant to this
act as a result of the provisions of subsection 1 . [; and
(b) A governing body that is required to submit a report
pursuant to section 13.5 of this act shall submit a copy of the
separate detailed description required by paragraph (a) for the
period covered by the report to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before the date by which the governing
body is required to submit the report for that period to the
Department pursuant to section 13.5 of this act.]
Sec. 21. NRS 391.155 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 22. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)